Rhode Island statutes. Title 40 Human Services
Chapter 14 Equipment Loan Fund for People with Disabilities

40-14-1.
Definitions.

For the purpose of this chapter, the following terms shall have the following meanings:

“Department” means the state department of human services.

“Director” means the director of the department of human services.

“Fund” means the equipment loan fund for people with disabilities.

“Person with a disability” means any person who has a physical or mental impairment, whether congenital or resulting from trauma or disease, that substantially limits one or more major life activities.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 611, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 83, § 102; P.L. 1999, ch. 130, § 102.

40-14-2.
Fund established.

There is hereby established a separate fund within the general fund to be called the equipment loan fund for people with disabilities, which shall be administered by the general treasurer in accordance with the same laws and fiscal procedures as the general funds of the state. There is hereby appropriated to this fund the sum of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000). The department through its vocational rehabilitation agency shall be responsible for the administration of the program but may contract with organizations in carrying out the provisions of this chapter. All payments of interest and repayments of principal made by recipients of loans under this chapter shall be credited to general revenues.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 611, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 40, § 122; P.L. 1999, ch. 83, § 102; P.L. 1999, ch. 130, § 102.

40-14-3.
Purpose of fund.

The fund shall provide loans to finance the purchase or replacement of essential equipment used by persons with disabilities for daily living or vocational functioning, including, but not limited to, prostheses, ramps, wheelchairs, wheelchair van lifts, and devices enabling persons with vision impairment to utilize printed materials.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 611, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 83, § 102; P.L. 1999, ch. 130, § 102.

40-14-4.
Eligibility.

Eligibility for loans from the fund shall be based upon need pursuant to rules and regulations promulgated by the director. It is the intent of the general assembly that loans from the fund be available to persons with disabilities whose personal financial resources are such that they cannot purchase the equipment directly without undue hardship.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 611, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 83, § 102; P.L. 1999, ch. 130, § 102.

40-14-5.
Persons to whom available.

Loans shall be made available directly to the person with a disability or, where appropriate, to the parent or legal guardian of the person with a disability.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 611, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 83, § 102; P.L. 1999, ch. 130, § 102.

40-14-6.
Maximum loan.

Loans from the fund shall not exceed a total of five thousand dollars ($5,000) per applicant.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 611, § 1.

40-14-7.
Interest rates.

Interest rates for loans from the fund shall be established by the director; provided, however, that those rates shall be substantially lower than the prevailing rate of interest in this state for comparable loans, and shall not exceed five percent (5%). The term of the loan shall not exceed ten (10) years.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 611, § 1.

40-14-8.
Rules and regulations.

The director shall, with the advice of the governor’s commission on disabilities, promulgate rules and regulations concerning eligibility, interest rates, repayment terms, and other matters as are necessary and proper to carry out the purpose of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 611, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 83, § 102; P.L. 1999, ch. 130, § 102.

40-14-9.
Reports.

The director shall file reports with the governor and the general assembly on or before January 30, 1989, 1990, and 1991. Each report shall include a detailed accounting of the loans from and repayments to the fund during the preceding calendar year; the director’s recommendation as to whether the fund’s maximum total loan authority, as set forth in §

40-14-6

, should be increased or reduced; and other information as the director deems relevant to an evaluation of the performance of the fund.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 611, § 1.

40-14-10.
Loans.

Loans made under the provisions of this chapter shall be exempt from truth in lending and loan licensure provisions of the Rhode Island general laws.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 611, § 1.